North Dakota, session 69, HB1204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 16.1-10-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
16.1-10-04. Publication of false information in political advertisements - Penalty.
1. A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if thatthe person knowingly, or with reckless
disregard for its truth or falsity, publishes anya political advertisement or news release that
contains anycontaining an assertion, representation, or statement of fact, including information
concerning a candidate's prior public record, which is untrue, deceptive, or misleading,
whether on behalf of or in opposition to any candidate for public office, initiated measure,
referred measure, constitutional amendment, or any other issue, question, or proposal on an
election ballot, and whether the publicationwhich is published by radio, television, newspaper,
text message, telephone call, pamphlet, folder, display cards, signs, posters, billboard
advertisements, websites, electronic transmission , social media , or by any other public means
or commercial medium.
2. This section does not apply to a newspaper, television or radio station, or other commercial
medium that is not the source of the political advertisement or news release.

H. B. NO. 1204 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1204.
House Vote: Yeas 77 Nays 14 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State